Missouri, session 2026, HB3383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 355, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 355.910, to read as follows:
355.910. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply to:
(1) Any nonprofit corporation that is a nonprofit corporation regulated under
Section 501(c)(3) or Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) Any nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state.
2. An entity listed in subsection 1 of this section shall, for any employee hired to
provide personal services for any political purpose or to take an active part in political
management or a political campaign, use the E-Verify system created under Section 403
(a) of the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, as
amended.
3. A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall result in the following civil
penalties:
(1) For a first offense, a fine between two hundred fifty and two thousand dollars
per employee hired to provide personal services for any political purpose or to take an
active part in political management or a political campaign without the use of the E-
Verify system;
(2) For a second offense, a fine between two thousand and five thousand dollars
per employee hired to provide personal services for any political purpose or to take an
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3383 2
active part in political management or a political campaign without use of the E-Verify
system; or
(3) For any subsequent offense, a fine between three thousand and ten thousand
dollars per day per employee hired to provide personal services for any political purpose
or to take an active part in political management or a political campaign without the use
of the E-Verify system.
4. If an entity listed in subsection 1 of this section uses the E-Verify system
created under Section 403(a) of the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant
Responsibility Act of 1996, as amended, is notified that the employee is not authorized to
work in the United States, and continues to employ such employee, the entity shall be
subject to the following civil penalties:
(1) For a first offense, a fine between two hundred fifty and two thousand dollars
per employee;
(2) For a second offense, a fine between two thousand and five thousand dollars
per employee; or
(3) For any subsequent offense, a fine between three thousand and ten thousand
dollars per day per employee.
✔